Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-903
Approved certifying body, defined.

Approved certifying body means a national certification organization which (1) is approved by the board, (2) certifies qualified licensed registered nurses for advanced practice, (3) has eligibility requirements related to education and practice, and (4) offers an examination in an area of practice which meets psychometric guidelines and tests approved by the board.

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-17,118;

Laws 2007, LB185, § 28;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 493;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 255.